Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,278
Mobile food establishment operators; guidance document.

The department shall develop and make available to the public a guidance document for mobile food establishment operators. The guidance document shall describe food establishment permit requirements applicable to mobile food establishments, including permit requirements applicable to reciprocity agreements between participating regulatory authorities under section 81-2,278.01.

Laws 2023, LB562, § 29.